sk-SK: Typ konektora systémového/napájacieho kábla (koniec B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB typu C napájanie; Iné
da: System-/strømkabelstiktype (ende B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Andet
vi: Loại đầu nối cáp hệ thống/nguồn (đầu B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C cấp nguồn; Khác
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อสายเคเบิลระบบ/พลังงาน (ปลาย B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; อื่นๆ
de: System-/Stromkabel-Steckertyp (Ende B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Typ-C Power Delivery; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di connettore del cavo di sistema/alimentazione (estremità B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB tipo C Power Delivery; Altro
ja: システム／電源ケーブルコネクタータイプ（端B）: IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; その他
el: Τύπος συνδετήρα καλωδίου συστήματος/τροφοδοσίας (άκρο B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Άλλο
nb: System/strøm-kabelkontakttype (ende B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Annet
cs: Typ konektoru systémového/napájecího kabelu (konec B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB typ C Power Delivery; Jiné
ru: Тип разъема системного/силового кабеля (конец В): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Другой
zh-TW: 系統/電源纜線連接器類型 (端 B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C 電源供應; 其他
hu: Rendszer/tápkábel csatlakozótípusa (B-vég): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Egyéb
tr: Sistem/Güç kablosu konnektör tipi (uç B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C güç dağıtımı; Diğer
fi: Järjestelmän/virtakaapelin liitintyyppi (pää B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Muu
ko: 시스템/전원 케이블 커넥터 유형 (끝 B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB 타입-C 파워 딜리버리; 기타
nl: Type systeem/voedingskabelconnector (uiteinde B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Andere
pt-PT: Tipo de conector de cabo de sistema/energia (extremidade B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Tipo C Power Delivery; Outro
pl: Typ złącza kabla systemowego/zasilającego (końcówka B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB typu C Power Delivery; Inne
ro-RO: Tip conector cablu sistem/alimentare (capăt B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB tip C cu alimentare; Altele
sv: System-/strömkabelkontakttyp (ände B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Typ-C Power Delivery; Övrigt
zh-CN: 系统/电源电缆连接器类型（端 B）: IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C 供电; 其他
en: System/Power cable connector type (end B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Other
hr-HR: Tip konektora sustava/napajanja (kraj B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB tip C isporuka energije; Ostalo
es: Tipo de conector del cable de sistema/alimentación (extremo B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB tipo C Power Delivery; Otros
fr: Type de connecteur de câble système/alimentation (extrémité B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Autre
lt-LT: Sistemos/maitinimo kabelio jungties tipas (B galas): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C maitinimo tiekimas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип конектор на системен/захранващ кабел (край Б): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB тип C Power Delivery; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de conector de cabo de sistema/energia (extremidade B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Tipo C Power Delivery; Outro
sl-SI: Tip priključka sistemskega/napajalnega kabla (konec B): IEC C13; IEC C15; IEC C19; IEC C20; IEC C5; IEC C7; NEMA 5-15P; NEMA 5-15R; USB Type-C Power Delivery; Drugo